Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
CHAPTER 8 Intergovernmental Cooperation

8.010.
Interstate Cooperation Commission consists of Legislative Research Commission — Duties.

The Legislative Research Commission, as the Kentucky Commission on Interstate Cooperation under KRS

7.110

, shall encourage and assist the legislative, executive, and judicial officials and employees of the Commonwealth to develop and maintain personal contact, with departments, agencies, officials, and employees of the other states, of the federal government, and of local units of government.

The Commission shall carry forward the participation of Kentucky as a member of the Council of State Governments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 1, effective June 16, 1966.

8.020.
Meetings of Commission and advisory boards.

The Commission and any advisory boards or committees of the Commission shall hold regular meetings between and during sessions of the General Assembly.

The Commission is authorized to call meetings of any advisory board or committee of the Commission, and require a comprehensive written report concerning the activities of such committee or advisory board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 9, effective June 16, 1966.

8.030.
Governor’s Advisory Committee on Intergovernmental Relations — Membership — Functions — Chairman. [Repealed.]

8.040.
Methods of promoting intergovernmental cooperation.

The Commission shall advance cooperation between the Commonwealth and other units of government by exercising principal responsibility and authority for:

The proposing of compacts;

The proposing of uniform laws, model laws, and reciprocal statutes;

The encouraging of uniform or reciprocal administrative rules and regulations;

The interchange and clearance of research and information; and

Any other intergovernmental action, agreement, or process that affects intergovernmental cooperation.

The Commission shall periodically evaluate the administration of the programs set forth in subsection (1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 2, effective June 16, 1966.

8.050.
Encouragement of state-local and interlocal cooperation.

The Commission shall encourage state-local and interlocal cooperation by formulating proposals for, and by facilitating the enactment of statutes and the adoption of administrative agreements to give departments and agencies of the Commonwealth and the local governmental units of the Commonwealth broad authority to enter into intergovernmental agreements, contracts and compacts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 3, effective June 16, 1966.

8.060.
Analysis and recommendations of legislative proposals — Studies by other states to be available.

The Commission shall analyze studies, reports, and suggested legislative proposals prepared by the Council of State Governments, the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, and similar agencies, and make recommendations with respect thereto to the Governor and General Assembly.

The Commission shall inform members of the General Assembly and other state officials and employees of the publications and services made available by the Council of State Governments, and the Kentucky commission on interstate cooperation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 4, effective June 16, 1966.

8.070.
Reports of Commission — Requirement of reports from state agencies.

The Commission shall submit comprehensive reports to the General Assembly in writing at each regular legislative session concerning the Commission’s operations.

The Commission may require annual comprehensive written reports from any agency or official of the Commonwealth, concerning any intergovernmental cooperative activity that such agency or official is engaged in, or concerned with, and any such additional reports that the Commission may desire from time to time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 5, effective June 16, 1966.

8.080.
Selection of Kentucky’s members on interstate organizations.

The Commission shall select Kentucky’s member on the board of managers of the Council of State Governments. The Commission also is authorized to select from among the members of the General Assembly, the legislative member or members of any interstate body created by statute if no other method of selection of such member or members is set forth by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 6, effective June 16, 1966.

8.090.
State agencies to advise and assist.

Whenever requested by the Commission, the head of any state department or agency shall give such advice or assistance and submit such written reports as the Commission may request, or designate a qualified state official to give such advice or assistance as the Commission may request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 91, § 7, effective June 16, 1966.